apertium-ht-en.ht.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlò</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="postdet"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="uns"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="e__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="si__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="liv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lib__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="en__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mil</l>
          <r>mil<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="milyon__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="souple__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="koumon__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ki__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kisa__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/e__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ete</l>
          <r>e<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Unverified">
        <p>
          <l>e<b/>te</l>
          <r>e<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>e<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>été</l>
          <r>e<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gen__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vle__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vbmod"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ka__vaux">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vaux"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chanje__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="an__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ayiti__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Obama__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Noe__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ev__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Linux__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="divès__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anpil__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kèk__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sa__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>yo</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>-yo</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'yo</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yon__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sé__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/la__postdet">
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>lan</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nan</l>
          <r>la<s n="postdet"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yo__postdet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="postdet"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mwen__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pi__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="premye__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ki__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="te__part">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fi"><i>fi</i><par n="liv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inisyalizasyon"><i>inisyalizasyon</i><par n="liv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epistemoloji"><i>epistemoloji</i><par n="liv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alamòd"><i>alamòd</i><par n="lib__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="enperatif"><i>enperatif</i><par n="lib__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vendikatif"><i>vendikatif</i><par n="lib__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kisa"><i>kisa</i><par n="ki__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="pouri ke"><i>pouri<b/>ke</i><par n="si__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="akòz"><i>akòz</i><par n="si__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="anvan"><i>anvan</i><par n="si__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="vle"><i>vle</i><par n="vle__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>s</i><par n="s/e__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="gen"><i>gen</i><par n="gen__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="genyen"><i>genyen</i><par n="gen__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="kap"><i>kap</i><par n="ka__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="mèt"><i>mèt</i><par n="ka__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="adore"><i>adore</i><par n="chanje__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="antre"><i>antre</i><par n="chanje__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="t ap" r="LR"><p><l>t<b/>ap</l><r>tap</r></p><par n="te__part"/></e>
    <e lm="pwal" r="LR"><p><l>pwal</l><r>pral</r></p><par n="te__part"/></e>
    <e lm="bonjou"><i>bonjou</i><par n="souple__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="byensi"><i>byensi</i><par n="souple__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="apa"><i>apa</i><par n="souple__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="èske"><i>èske</i><par n="koumon__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="èkse" c="typo?"><i>èkse</i><par n="koumon__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kilè"><i>kilè</i><par n="koumon__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ki"><i>ki</i><par n="ki__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kilès"><i>kilès</i><par n="ki__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kisa"><i>kisa</i><par n="ki__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kisa"><i>kisa</i><par n="kisa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kilès"><i>kilès</i><par n="kisa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kimoun"><i>kimoun</i><par n="kisa__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="plis"><i>plis</i><par n="pi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="trè"><i>trè</i><par n="pi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="twazyèm"><i>twazyèm</i><par n="premye__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sèzyèm"><i>sèzyèm</i><par n="premye__det"/></e>
    <e lm="divès"><i>divès</i><par n="divès__det"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="yon__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sé"><i>sé</i><par n="sé__det"/></e>
    <e lm="chak"><i>chak</i><par n="yon__det"/></e>
    <e lm="anpil"><i>anpil</i><par n="anpil__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kèk"><i>kèk</i><par n="kèk__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kont"><i>kont</i><par n="anpil__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sa"><i>sa</i><par n="sa__det"/></e>
    <e lm="la"><i></i><par n="/la__postdet"/></e>
    <e lm="Oseyan Atlantik"><i>Oseyan<b/>Atlantik</i><par n="Ayiti__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eztazini" r="LR"><p><l>Eztazini</l><r>Etazini</r></p><par n="Ayiti__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mari"><i>Mari</i><par n="Ev__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ev"><i>Ev</i><par n="Ev__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Woubenn"><i>Woubenn</i><par n="Noe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Abraram"><i>Abraram</i><par n="Noe__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marino"><i>Marino</i><par n="Obama__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Clinton"><i>Clinton</i><par n="Obama__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nasyonzuni" r="LR"><p><l>Nasyonzuni</l><r>Nasyon<b/>Zuni</r></p><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Linux"><i>Linux</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="epi"><i>epi</i><par n="e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oswa"><i>oswa</i><par n="e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bò"><i>bò</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="anfas"><i>anfas</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wit"><i>wit</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sèz"><i>sèz</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
    <e lm="swasanndis"><i>swasanndis</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
    <e lm="milyon"><i>milyon</i><par n="milyon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="k'"><p><l>k'</l><r>ki</r></p><par n="ki__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="-m" r="LR"><p><l>-m</l><r>mwen</r></p><par n="mwen__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'m" r="LR"><p><l>'m</l><r>mwen</r></p><par n="mwen__det"/></e>
    <e lm="-yo" r="LR"><p><l>-yo</l><r>yo</r></p><par n="yo__postdet"/></e>
    <e lm="'yo" r="LR"><p><l>'yo</l><r>yo</r></p><par n="yo__postdet"/></e>
